Washington statutes.
RCW 9.18.080

Offender a competent witness.

Every person offending against any of the provisions of law relating to bribery or corruption shall be a competent witness against another so offending and shall not be excused from giving testimony tending to criminate himself or herself.

[ 2011 c 336 s 295; 1909 c 249 s 78; RRS s 2330. Cf. 1907 c 60 ss 1, 2; RRS ss 2149, 2150.]

NOTES:

Bribery and corruption: Chapter 9A.68 RCW.

Incriminating testimony not to be used: RCW 10.52.090.

Rights of accused persons: State Constitution Art. 1 s 9.